California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The final payment to a designated public hospital for purposes of subdivision (b) and paragraph (1) of this subdivision, shall be subject to final audits of all applicable Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data for the project year, and the distribution priorities set forth in Section 14166.20.

(d) (1) Each designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, shall be eligible to receive additional safety net care pool payments above the baseline funding amount or adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate, from the Health Care Support Fund, established pursuant to Section 14166.21, for the project year through October 31, 2010, in accordance with the stabilization funding determination for the hospital
 made pursuant to Section 14166.75.

(2) Payment of the additional safety net care pool amounts shall be subject to the distribution priorities set forth in Section 14166.21.

(3) The provisions of this section shall apply only with respect to the demonstration project term, and shall not apply with respect to the successor demonstration project term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 9.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.71.

(a) (1) With respect to each successor demonstration year, designated public hospitals, or governmental entities with which they are affiliated, shall be eligible to receive safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care from the Health Care Support Fund established pursuant to Section 14166.21. Safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care shall be allocated to designated public hospitals as follows:

(A) The department shall determine the maximum amount of safety net pool payments for uncompensated care that is available to designated public hospitals for the successor demonstration year.

(B) The department shall calculate for each designated public hospital an initial SNCP claiming ability amount. For the purposes of this article, “initial SNCP claiming ability amount” means the total sum of the uncompensated Medi-Cal, Low Income Health Program, and uninsured costs of services incurred by the designated public hospital, the governmental entity, nonhospital clinics, and other provider types with which it is affiliated, that are reported as eligible certified public expenditures for safety net care pool uncompensated care claiming pursuant to Section 14166.8.

(C) The available safety net pool payments shall be allocated
 pro rata among the designated public hospitals based upon each hospital’s initial SNCP claiming ability amount as determined pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(2) The department shall establish the amount of the safety net care pool payment described in paragraph (1) for each designated public hospital in a manner that maximizes federal Medicaid funding to the state during the term of the successor demonstration project.

(3) A safety net care pool payment amount may be paid to a designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, pursuant to this section independent of the amount of uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs that is certified as public expenditures pursuant to Section 14166.8, provided that, in accordance with the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project, the recipient hospital does not return any portion of the
 funds received to any unit of government, excluding amounts recovered by the state or federal government.

(4) In establishing the amount to be paid to each designated public hospital under this subdivision, the department shall minimize to the extent possible the redistribution of federal funds that are based on certified public expenditures as described in paragraph (3).

(b) (1) Each designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, shall receive the amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) in quarterly interim payments during the successor demonstration year. The determination of the interim payments shall be made on an interim basis prior to the start of each successor demonstration year. The department shall use the same cost and statistical data that is used in determining the interim payments for Medi-Cal inpatient hospital services under
 Section 14166.4 and for the disproportionate share hospital allocations under Section 14166.61, for the corresponding period.

(2) Prior to the distribution of payments in accordance with paragraph (1) and subdivision (c) to a designated public hospital that is part of a hospital system containing multiple designated public hospitals licensed to the same governmental entity, the department shall consult with the applicable governmental entity. The department shall implement any adjustments to the payment distributions for the hospitals in that hospital system as requested by the governmental entity if the net effect of the requested adjustments for those hospitals is zero. These payment redistributions shall recognize the level of care provided to Medi-Cal and uninsured patients and shall maintain the viability and effectiveness of the hospital system.

(c) (1) No later than April 1
 following the end of the relevant reporting period for the successor demonstration year, the department shall undertake an interim reconciliation of the payment amount established pursuant to subdivision (a) for each designated public hospital using Medicare and other cost, payment, and statistical data submitted by the hospital for the successor demonstration year, and shall adjust payments to the hospital accordingly.

(2) The final payment to a designated public hospital for purposes of subdivision (b) and paragraph (1) of this subdivision, shall be subject to final audits of all applicable Medicare and other cost, payment, discharge, and statistical data for the successor demonstration year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 10.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.75.

(a) For services provided during the 2005–06 and 2006–07 project years, the amount allocated to designated public hospitals pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20 shall be allocated, in accordance with this section, among the designated public hospitals. For services provided during the 2007–08, 2008–09, and 2009–10
 project years through October 31, 2010, amounts allocated to designated public hospitals as stabilization funding pursuant to any provision of this article, unless otherwise specified, shall be allocated among the designated public hospitals in accordance with this section. All amounts allocated to designated public hospitals in accordance with this section shall be paid as direct grants, which shall not constitute Medi-Cal payments.

(b) The baseline funding amount, as determined under Section 14166.5, for San Mateo Medical Center shall be increased by eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for purposes of this section.

(c) The following payments shall be made from the amount identified in subdivision (a), in addition to any other payments due to the University of California hospitals and health system and County of Los Angeles hospitals under this section:

(1) The lower of eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) or 3.67 percent of the amount identified in subdivision (a) to the University of California hospitals and health system.

(2) For each of the 2005–06 and 2006–07 project years, in the event that the one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) identified in paragraph 41 of the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project is available in the safety net care pool for the project year, the lower of twenty-three million dollars ($23,000,000) or 7.67 percent of the amount identified in subdivision (a) to the County of Los Angeles, Department of Health Services, hospitals. If an amount less than the one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) is available during the project year, the amount determined under this paragraph shall be reduced proportionately.

(d) For the 2005–06 and 2006–07 project years, the amount identified in subdivision (a), as reduced by the amounts identified in subdivision (c), shall be distributed among the designated public hospitals pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) Designated public hospitals that are donor hospitals, and their associated donated certified public expenditures, shall be identified as follows:

(A) An initial pro rata allocation of the amount subject to this subdivision shall be made to each designated public hospital, based upon the hospital’s baseline funding amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.5, and as further adjusted in subdivision (b). This initial allocation shall be used for purposes of the calculations under subparagraph (C) and paragraph (3).

(B) The federal financial participation amount arising
 from the certified public expenditures of each designated public hospital, including the expenditures of the governmental entity, nonhospital clinics, and other provider types with which it is affiliated, that were claimed by the department from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9, and from the safety net care pool funds pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9, shall be determined.

(C) The amount of federal financial participation received by each designated public hospital, and by the governmental entity, nonhospital clinics, and other provider types with which it is affiliated, based on certified public expenditures from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.6, and from the safety net care pool payments pursuant to subdivision (a) of
 Section 14166.7 shall be identified. With respect to this identification, if a payment adjustment for a hospital has been made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14166.6, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.7, the amount of federal financial participation received by the hospital based on certified public expenditures shall be determined as though no such payment adjustment had been made. The resulting amount shall be increased by amounts distributed to the hospital pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20, and the initial allocation determined for the hospitals in subparagraph (A).

(D) If the amount in subparagraph (B) is greater than the amount determined in subparagraph (C), the hospital is a donor hospital, and the difference between the two amounts is deemed to be that donor hospital’s associated donated certified public expenditures amount.

(2) Seventy percent of the total amount subject to this subdivision shall be allocated pro rata among the designated public hospitals based upon each hospital’s baseline funding amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.5, and as further adjusted in subdivision (b).

(3) The lesser of the remaining 30 percent of the total amount subject to this subdivision or the total amounts of donated certified public expenditures for all donor hospitals, shall be distributed pro rata among the donor hospitals based upon the donated certified public expenditures amount determined for each donor hospital. Any amounts not distributed pursuant to this paragraph shall be distributed in the same manner as set forth in paragraph (2).

(e) For the 2007–08 and subsequent project years through October 31, 2010, the amount identified in
 subdivision (a), as reduced by the amounts identified in subdivision (c), shall be distributed among the designated public hospitals pursuant to this subdivision.

(1) Each designated public hospital that renders inpatient hospital services under the health care coverage initiative program authorized pursuant to Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900) shall be allocated an amount equal to the amount of the federal safety net pool funds claimed and received with respect to the services rendered by the hospital, including services rendered to enrollees of a managed care organization, to the extent the amount was included in the determination of total stabilization funding for the project year pursuant to Section 14166.20.

(2) Each designated public hospital for which, during the project year, the sum of the allowable costs incurred in rendering inpatient hospital services to
 Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the allowable costs incurred with respect to supplemental reimbursement for physician and nonphysician practitioner services rendered to Medi-Cal hospital inpatients, as specified in Section 14166.4, exceeds the allowable costs incurred for those services rendered in the prior year, shall be allocated an amount equal to 60 percent of the difference in the allowable costs, multiplied by the applicable federal medical assistance percentage. The allocations under this paragraph, however, shall be reduced pro rata as necessary to ensure that the total of those allocations does not exceed 80 percent of the amount subject to this subdivision after the allocations in paragraph (1). For purposes of this paragraph, the most recent cost data that are available at the time of the department’s determinations for the project year pursuant to Section 14166.20 shall be used.

(3) The remaining amount subject to this subdivision that
 is not otherwise allocated pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be allocated as set forth below:

(A) Designated public hospitals that are donor hospitals, and their associated donated certified public expenditures, shall be identified as follows:

(i) An initial pro rata allocation of the amount subject to this paragraph shall be made to each designated public hospital, based upon the total allowable costs incurred by each hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, in rendering hospital services to the uninsured during the project year as reported pursuant to Section 14166.8. This initial allocation shall be used for purposes of the calculations under clause (iii) and subparagraph (C).

(ii) The federal financial participation amount arising from the certified public expenditures of each
 designated public hospital, including the expenditures of the governmental entity, nonhospital clinics, and other provider types with which it is affiliated, that were claimed by the department from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9, and from the safety net care pool funds pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14166.9, shall be determined.

(iii) The amount of federal financial participation received by each designated public hospital, and by the governmental entity, nonhospital clinics, and other provider types with which it is affiliated, based on certified public expenditures from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.6, and from the safety net care pool payments pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14166.7 shall be identified. With
 respect to this identification, if a payment adjustment for a hospital has been made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14166.6, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.7, the amount of federal financial participation received by the hospital based on certified public expenditures shall be determined as though no payment adjustment had been made. The resulting amount shall be increased by amounts distributed to the hospital pursuant to subdivision (c), paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.20, and the initial allocation determined for the hospitals in clause (i).

(iv) If the amount in clause (ii) is greater than the amount determined in clause (iii), the hospital is a donor hospital, and the difference between the two amounts is deemed to be that donor hospital’s associated donated certified public expenditures amount.

(B) Fifty percent of the total amount subject to this paragraph shall be allocated pro rata among the designated public hospitals in the same manner described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A).

(C) The lesser of the remaining 50 percent of the total amount subject to this paragraph, the total amounts of donated certified public expenditures for all donor hospitals or that amount that is 30 percent of the amount subject to this subdivision after the allocations in paragraph (1), shall be distributed pro rata among the donor hospitals based upon the donated certified public expenditures amount determined for each donor hospital. Any amounts not distributed pursuant to this subparagraph shall be distributed in the same manner as set forth in subparagraph (B).

(D) The federal financial participation amount arising from the
 certified public expenditures that has been paid to designated public hospitals, or the governmental entities with which they are affiliated, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14166.221 shall be disregarded for purposes of this paragraph.

(f) The department shall consult with designated public hospital representatives regarding the appropriate distribution of stabilization funding before stabilization funds are allocated and paid to hospitals. No later than 30 days after this consultation, the department shall issue a final allocation of stabilization funding under this section that shall not be modified for any reason other than mathematical errors or mathematical omissions on the part of the department.

(g) The provisions of this section shall apply only with respect to the demonstration project term, and shall not apply with respect to the successor demonstration project
 term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 11.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.77.

(a) (1) The amount of delivery system reform incentive pool funding, consisting of both the federal and nonfederal share of payments, that is made available to each designated public hospital system in the aggregate for the term of the successor demonstration project shall be based initially on the delivery system reform proposals that are submitted by the designated public hospitals to the department for review and submission to the
 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for final approval. The initial percentages of delivery system reform incentive pool funding among the designated public hospital systems for each successor demonstration year shall be determined based on the annual components as contained in the approved proposals.

(2) The actual receipt of funds shall be conditioned on the designated public hospital system’s progress toward, and achievement of, the specified milestones and other metrics established in its approved delivery system reform incentive pool proposal. A designated public hospital system may carry forward available incentive pool funding associated with milestones and metrics from one year to a subsequent period as authorized by the Special Terms and Conditions and the final delivery system reform incentive pool protocol.

(3) The department may reallocate incentive pool
 funding under conditions specified, and as authorized by, the Special Terms and Conditions and the final delivery system reform incentive pool protocol.

(b) Each designated public hospital system shall be individually responsible for progress toward, and achievement of, milestones and other metrics in its proposal, as well as other applicable requirements specified in the Special Terms and Conditions and the final delivery system reform incentive pool protocol, in order to receive its specified allocation of incentive pool funding under this section.

(1) The designated public hospital system shall submit semiannual reports and requests for payment to the department by March 31 and the September 30 following the end of the second and fourth quarters of the successor demonstration year, or comply with such other process as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
 Services. A standardized report form shall be developed jointly by the department and designated public hospital systems for this purpose.

(2) Within 14 days after the semiannual report due date, the designated public hospital system or its affiliated governmental entity shall make an intergovernmental transfer of funds equal to the nonfederal share that is necessary to draw down the federal funding for the pool payment related to the achievement or progress metric that is certified. The intergovernmental transfers shall be deposited into the Public Hospital Investment, Improvement, and Incentive Fund, established pursuant to Section 14182.4.

(3) The department shall draw down the federal funding and pay both the nonfederal and federal shares of the incentive payment to the designated public hospital system or other affiliated governmental provider as applicable. If the
 intergovernmental transfer is made within the appropriate 14-day timeframe, the incentive payment shall be disbursed within seven days with the expedited payment process as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, otherwise the payment shall be disbursed within 20 days of when the transfer is made.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, payment requests for successor demonstration year 6 shall be submitted, processed, and paid in accordance with the expedited payment process as approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(5) The designated public hospital system or other affiliated governmental provider is responsible for any fee or cost required to implement the expedited payment process in accordance with Section 8422.1 of the State Administrative Manual.

(c) In the event of a conflict between any provision of this section and the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project and the final delivery system reform incentive pool protocol, the Special Terms and Conditions and the final delivery system reform incentive pool protocol shall control.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 12.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.8.

(a) Within five months after the end of each project year or successor demonstration year, each of the designated public hospitals shall submit to the department all of the following reports:

(1) The hospital’s Medicare cost report for the project year or successor demonstration year.

(2) Other cost reporting and statistical data necessary for the determination of amounts due the hospital under the demonstration project or successor demonstration project, as requested by the department.

(b) For each project year or successor demonstration year, the reports shall identify all of the following:

(1) The costs incurred in providing inpatient hospital services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries on a fee-for-service basis and physician and nonphysician practitioner services costs, as identified in subdivision (e) of Section 14166.4.

(2) The amount of uncompensated costs incurred in providing hospital services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, including managed care enrollees.

(3) The costs incurred in providing hospital services to uninsured
 individuals.

(4) (A) Discharge data, commencing with successor demonstration year 6, and retrospectively for prior periods as necessary to establish interim payment determinations, for the following patient categories:

(i) Uninsured patients.

(ii) Low Income Health Program patients.

(iii) Medi-Cal patients, excluding discharges for which Medicare payments were received.

(B) The department shall consult with the designated public hospitals regarding a methodology for adjusting prior period discharge data to reflect the projected number of discharges relating to Low Income Health Program patients for the period at issue.

(c) (1) Each designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, that operates nonhospital clinics or provides physician, nonphysician practitioner, or other health care services that are not identified as hospital services under the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, may report and certify all, or a portion, of the uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs of the services furnished.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), beginning with the 2012–13 fiscal year, and for each successor demonstration year thereafter, each designated public hospital, or governmental entity with which it is affiliated, that operates nonhospital clinics or provides physician, nonphysician practitioner, or other health care services that are not identified as hospital services under the Special Terms and
 Conditions for the successor demonstration project, shall report and certify all of the uncompensated uninsured costs of the services furnished that meet the requirements of subdivisions (d) and (e).

 (3) The amount of these uncompensated costs to be claimed by the department shall be determined by the department in consultation with the governmental entity so as to optimize the level of claimable federal Medicaid funding.

(d) Reports submitted under this section shall include all allowable costs.

(e) The appropriate public official shall certify to all of the following:

(1) The accuracy of the reports required under this section.

(2) That the expenditures to meet the reported costs comply
 with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) That the sources of funds used to make the expenditures certified under this section do not include impermissible provider taxes or donations as defined under Section 1396b(w) of Title 42 of the United States Code or other federal funds. For this purpose, federal funds do not include delivery system reform incentive pool payments, patient care revenue received as payment for services rendered under programs such as designated state health programs, the Low Income Health Program, Medicare, or Medicaid.

(f) The certification of public expenditures made pursuant to this section shall be based on a schedule established by the department. The director may require the designated public hospitals to submit quarterly estimates of anticipated expenditures, if these estimates are necessary to obtain interim payments of
 federal Medicaid funds. All reported expenditures shall be subject to reconciliation to allowable costs, as determined in accordance with applicable implementing documents for the demonstration project and successor demonstration project.

(g) Subject to the determination made under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the director shall seek Medicaid federal financial participation for all certified public expenditures reported by the designated public hospitals and recognized under the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, to the extent consistent with Section 14166.9.

(h) Governmental or public entities other than those that operate a designated public hospital may, at the request of a governmental or public entity, certify uncompensated Medi-Cal and uninsured costs in accordance with this section, subject to the department’s discretion and prior approval of
 the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(i) The timeframes for data submission and reporting periods may be adjusted as necessary with respect to the 2010–11 project year through October 31, 2010, and successor demonstration years 6 and 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 89.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.9.

(a) The department, in consultation with the designated public hospitals, shall determine the mix of sources of federal funds for payments to the designated public hospitals in a manner that provides baseline funding to hospitals as applicable during the demonstration project term and maximizes federal Medicaid funding to the state during the terms of the demonstration project and successor
 demonstration project.

(1) During the demonstration project term through October 31, 2010, federal funds shall be claimed according to the following priorities:

(A) The certified public expenditures of the designated public hospitals for inpatient hospital services and physician and nonphysician practitioner services, as identified in subdivision (e) of Section 14166.4, rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(B) Federal disproportionate share hospital allotment, subject to the federal hospital-specific limit, in the following order:

(i) Those hospital expenditures that are eligible for federal financial participation only from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(ii) Payments funded with intergovernmental transfers, consistent with the requirements of the demonstration project, up to the hospital’s baseline funding amount or adjusted baseline funding amount, as appropriate, for the project year.

(iii) Any other certified public expenditures for hospital services that are eligible for federal financial participation from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(C) Safety net care pool funds, using the optimal combination of hospital-certified public expenditures and certified public expenditures of a hospital, or governmental entity with which the hospital is affiliated, that operates nonhospital clinics or provides physician, nonphysician practitioner, or other health care services that are not identified as hospital services under the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project, except that
 certified public expenditures reported by the County of Los Angeles or its designated public hospitals shall be the exclusive source of certified public expenditures for claiming those federal funds deposited in the South Los Angeles Medical Services Preservation Fund under Section 14166.25.

(D) Health care expenditures of the state that represent alternate state funding mechanisms approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under the demonstration project as set forth in Section 14166.22.

(2) During each successor demonstration year, federal funds for payments to the designated public hospitals pursuant to Sections 14166.61 and 14166.71 shall be claimed according to the following priorities:

(A) With respect to the applicable federal disproportionate share hospital allotment, subject to the
 federal hospital-specific limit, in the following order:

(i) Payments funded with intergovernmental transfers, as determined pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 14166.61.

(ii) Those hospital expenditures that are eligible for federal financial participation only from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(iii) Any other certified public expenditures for hospital services that are eligible for federal financial participation from the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment.

(B) With respect to safety net care pool payments for uncompensated care, in the following order:

(i) The certified public expenditures of the designated public hospitals, or the
 governmental entities with which they are affiliated that operate nonhospital clinics or provide physician, nonphysician practitioner, or other health care services, that are not identified as hospital services under the Special Terms and Conditions for the successor demonstration project and eligible for federal financial participation from the safety net care pool for uncompensated care.

(ii) The available certified public expenditures of designated public hospitals for hospital services that are eligible for federal financial participation from either the federal disproportionate share hospital allotment or safety net care pool for uncompensated care, that were not otherwise claimed for purposes of subparagraph (A). 

(b) The department shall implement these priorities, to the extent possible, in a manner that minimizes the redistribution of federal funds that are based on the
 certified public expenditures of the designated public hospitals.

(c) The department may adjust the claiming priorities to the extent that these adjustments result in additional federal medicaid funding during the term of the demonstration project and successor demonstration project, or facilitate the objectives of subdivision (b).

(d) There is hereby established in the State Treasury the “Demonstration Disproportionate Share Hospital Fund.” All federal funds received by the department with respect to the certified public expenditures claimed pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be transferred to the fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department solely for the purposes specified in Sections 14166.6 and 14166.61.

(e) (1) Except as provided in Section 14166.25, all federal safety net care pool funds claimed and received by the department based on health care expenditures incurred by the designated public hospitals, or other governmental entities, shall be transferred to the Health Care Support Fund, established pursuant to Section 14166.21.

(2) The department shall separately identify and account for federal safety net care pool funds claimed and received by the department under the health care coverage initiative program authorized under Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 15900) and under paragraphs 43 and 44 of the Special Terms and Conditions for the demonstration project.

(3) With respect to those funds identified under paragraph (2), the department shall separately identify and account for federal safety net care pool funds claimed and received for
 inpatient hospital services rendered under the health care coverage initiative, including services rendered to enrollees of a managed care organization, by designated public hospitals, nondesignated public hospitals, and project year private DSH hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 86, Sec. 14.   (AB 1066)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.10.

(a) Payments to private hospitals under the demonstration project shall include, as applicable, all of the following:

(1) Payments under selective provider contracts with the department negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission in accordance with Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(2) Disproportionate share hospital replacement payments
 under Section 14166.11.

(3) Supplemental payments under Section 14166.12.

(4) Payments to distressed hospitals as negotiated by the California Medical Assistance Commission pursuant to Section 14166.23.

(5) Payments of amounts described in Section 14166.14.

(b) Payments under subdivision (a) shall be in addition to other payments that may be made in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 327, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.   Repealed on date prescribed in Section 14166.26 or in subd. (b) or (g) of Section 14166.2.)
-------------------------------------------

14166.11.

(a) The department shall pay to each project year private DSH hospital the amounts that would have been paid under the disproportionate share hospital program using the formulas and methodology in effect for the 2004–05 fiscal year as more specifically set forth in this section.

(b) For each project year, the department shall develop and issue a tentative and final
 disproportionate share list in accordance with Section 14105.98.

(c) For each project year, the department shall perform the computations set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and (6) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (am) and paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (an) of Section 14105.98, subject to the following:

(1) For purposes of these computations, the maximum state disproportionate share hospital allotment for California for each project year shall be the allotment effective during the federal fiscal year beginning during the project year.

(2) All references to October 1 shall be deemed to be references to July 1.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the transfer amounts for the Medi-Cal Inpatient Payment Adjustment
 Fund to the Health Care Deposit Fund, as provided for pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14163 shall be deemed to be eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) for purposes of the computations under this subdivision.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the payments made under this section shall be treated as payment adjustments made under Section 14105.98 for purposes of computing the OBRA 1993 payment limitation, as defined in paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, the low-income utilization rate, and all related computations.

(5) Subdivision (m) of Section 14105.98 shall apply to payments made under this section.

(d) Interim payments shall be made for the first five months of each project year as follows:

(1) Interim payments shall be made to each private hospital identified on a tentative disproportionate share list for the project year that was also on the final disproportionate share list for the prior fiscal year. The interim payment amount per month for each of these hospitals shall equal one-twelfth of the total payments, excluding stabilization funds, made to the hospital for the prior fiscal year under this section or under Section 14105.98. The interim payment amount may be adjusted to reflect any changes in the total payment amounts, excluding stabilization funds, projected to be made under this section for the project year.

(2) The computation of interim payments described in this subdivision shall be made promptly after the department issues the tentative disproportionate share hospital list for the project year.

(3) The first interim payment for a project